Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 2 Powers of Housing Authorities Generally

8-3-30.
General powers; applicability of laws as to acquisition, operation, or disposition of property by other public bodies.

An authority shall constitute a public body corporate and politic exercising public and essential governmental functions and having all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this article, including the following powers in addition to others granted by this article:

To sue and be sued; to have a seal and to alter the same at pleasure; to have perpetual succession; to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the authority; and to make and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, rules, and regulations, not inconsistent with this article, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the authority;

Within its area of operation, to prepare, carry out, acquire, lease, and operate housing projects; to provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration, or repair of any housing project or any part thereof;

To arrange or contract for the furnishing by any person or agency, public or private, of services, privileges, works, or facilities for, or in connection with, a housing project or the occupants thereof; and, notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this article or in any other provision of law, to include in any contract let in connection with a project stipulations requiring that the contractor and any subcontractors comply with requirements as to minimum wages and maximum hours of labor and comply with any conditions which the federal government may have attached to its financial aid of the project;

To lease or rent any dwellings, houses, accommodations, lands, buildings, structures, or facilities embraced in any housing project and, subject to the limitations contained in this article, to establish and revise the rents or charges therefor; to own, hold, and improve real or personal property; to purchase, lease, obtain options upon, or acquire by gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise any real or personal property or any interest therein; to acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any real property; to sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, or dispose of any real or personal property or any interest therein; to insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal property or operations of the authority against any risks or hazards; to procure insurance or guarantees from the federal government of the payment of any debts or parts thereof, whether or not incurred by said authority, secured by mortgages on any property included in any of its housing projects;

Subject to any agreement with bondholders, to invest moneys of the authority not required for immediate use to carry out the purposes of this part, including the proceeds from the sale of any bonds and any moneys held in reserve funds, in obligations which shall be limited to the following:

Bonds or other obligations of the state or other states or of other counties, municipal corporations, and political subdivisions of this state or bonds or other obligations the principal and interest of which are guaranteed by the state;

Bonds or other obligations of the United States or of subsidiary corporations of the United States government fully guaranteed by such government;

Obligations of and obligations guaranteed by agencies or instrumentalities of the United States government, including those issued by the Federal Land Bank, Federal Home Loan Bank, Federal Intermediate Credit Bank, Bank for Cooperatives, and any other such agency or instrumentality now or hereafter in existence; provided, however, that all such obligations shall have a current credit rating from a nationally recognized rating service of at least one of the three highest rating categories available and have a nationally recognized market;

Bonds or other obligations issued by any public housing agency or municipality in the United States, which bonds or obligations are fully secured as to the payment of both principal and interest by a pledge of annual contributions under an annual contributions contract or contracts with the United States government, or project notes issued by any public housing agency, urban renewal agency, or municipality in the United States and fully secured as to payment of both principal and interest by a requisition, loan, or payment agreement with the United States government;

Certificates of deposit of national or state banks located within the state which have deposits insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Georgia Deposit Insurance Corporation, including the certificates of deposit of any bank, savings and loan association, or building and loan association acting as depository, custodian, or trustee for any such bond proceeds; provided, however, that the portion of such certificates of deposit in excess of the amount insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Georgia Deposit Insurance Corporation, if any such excess exists, shall be secured by deposit with the Federal Reserve Bank of Atlanta, Georgia, the Federal Home Loan Bank of Atlanta, Georgia, any national or state bank located within the state, or with a trust office within this state, or one or more of the following securities in an aggregate principal amount equal at least to the amount of such excess:

Direct and general obligations of the state or other states or of any county or municipality in the state;

Obligations of the United States or subsidiary corporations included in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph;

Obligations of agencies and instrumentalities of the United States government included in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph; or

Bonds, obligations, or project notes of public housing agencies, urban renewal agencies, or municipalities included in subparagraph (D) of this paragraph;

Interest-bearing time deposits, repurchase agreements, reverse repurchase agreements, rate guarantee agreements, or other similar banking arrangements with a bank or trust company having capital and surplus aggregating at least $50 million or with any government bond dealer reporting to, trading with, and recognized as a primary dealer by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York having capital aggregating at least $50 million or with any corporation which is subject to registration with the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System pursuant to the requirements of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, provided that each such interest-bearing time deposit, repurchase agreement, reverse repurchase agreement, rate guarantee agreement, or other similar banking arrangement shall permit the moneys so placed to be available for use at the time provided with respect to the investment or reinvestment of such moneys;

Any and all other obligations of investment grade quality having a credit rating from a nationally recognized rating service of at least one of the three highest rating categories available and having a nationally recognized market, including, but not limited to, collateralized mortgage obligations, owner trusts offering collateralized mortgage obligations, guaranteed investment contracts offered by any firm, agency, business, governmental unit, bank, insurance company, corporation chartered by the United States Congress, or other entity, real estate mortgage investment conduits, mortgage obligations, mortgage pools, and pass-through securities; and

Securities of or other interests in any no-load, open-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, or any common trust fund maintained by any bank or trust company which holds such proceeds as trustee or by an affiliate thereof so long as:

The portfolio of such investment company or investment trust or common trust fund is limited to the obligations referenced in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this paragraph and repurchase agreements are fully collateralized by any such obligations;

Such investment company or investment trust or common trust fund takes delivery of such collateral either directly or through an authorized custodian;

Such investment company or investment trust or common trust fund is managed so as to maintain its shares at a constant net asset value; and

Securities of or other interests in such investment company or investment trust or common trust fund are purchased and redeemed only through the use of national or state banks located within this state having corporate trust powers;

Within its area of operation, to investigate into living, dwelling, and housing conditions and into the means and methods of improving such conditions; to determine where slum areas exist or where there is a shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income; to make studies and recommendations relating to the problem of clearing, replanning, and reconstructing slum areas, and the problem of providing dwelling accommodations for persons of low income and to cooperate with the city, the county, or the state or any political subdivision thereof in action taken in connection with such problem; and to engage in research, studies, and experimentation on the subject of housing;

Acting through one or more commissioners or other person or persons designated by the authority, to conduct examinations and investigations and to hear testimony and take proof under oath at public or private hearings on any matter material for its information; to administer oaths, issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses or the production of books and papers, and issue commissions for the examination of witnesses who are outside of the state or unable to attend before the authority, or who are excused from attendance; to make available to appropriate agencies, including those charged with the duty of abating or requiring the correction of nuisances or like conditions or of demolishing unsafe or insanitary structures within its area of operation, its findings and recommendations with regard to any building or property where conditions exist which are dangerous to the public health, morals, safety, or welfare;

To exercise all or any part or combination of powers granted by this Code section;

To invest moneys held in debt service reserve funds or sinking funds not required for immediate use or disbursement in obligations of the types specified in paragraph (5) of this subsection, provided that, for the purpose of this paragraph, the amounts and maturities of such obligations shall be based upon and correlated to the debt service (principal installments and interest payments) schedule for which moneys are to be supplied;

To incorporate one or more nonprofit corporations as subsidiary corporations of the authority for the purpose of carrying out any of the powers of the authority and accomplishing any of the purposes of the authority. Any such subsidiary corporation shall be a nonprofit corporation and a public body corporate and politic exercising public and essential governmental functions. Any subsidiary corporations created pursuant to this power shall be created pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 14, the “Georgia Nonprofit Corporation Code,” and the Secretary of State shall be authorized to accept such filings. Some or all of the members of the board of directors of the authority shall constitute the members of and shall serve as directors of any subsidiary corporation and such service shall not constitute a conflict of interest. Upon dissolution of any subsidiary corporation of the authority, any assets shall revert to the authority or to any successor to the authority or, failing such succession, to the city or the county, as applicable. The authority shall not be liable for the debts or obligations or bonds of any subsidiary corporation or for the actions or omissions to act of any subsidiary corporation unless the authority expressly so consents; and

To incorporate one or more corporations as subsidiary corporations of the authority for the purpose of carrying out any of the powers of the authority and accomplishing any of the purposes of the authority. Any subsidiary corporations created pursuant to this paragraph shall be created pursuant to Chapter 2 of Title 14, the “Georgia Business Corporation Code,” and the Secretary of State shall be authorized to accept such filings. Some or all of the members of the board of commissioners of the authority may serve as directors of any subsidiary corporation and such service shall not constitute a conflict of interest; provided, however, that no member of the board of commissioners of the authority shall be eligible to serve as a director of any subsidiary corporation if that member has any financial interest in the subsidiary corporation. Upon dissolution of any subsidiary corporation of the authority, any assets shall be distributed to the authority as the sole shareholder or to any successor to the authority or, failing such succession, to the city or county, as applicable. The authority shall not be liable for the debts, obligations, or bonds of any subsidiary corporation or for the actions or omissions to act of any subsidiary corporation unless the authority expressly so consents.

No provisions of law with respect to the acquisition, operation, or disposition of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to an authority unless the legislature shall specifically so state.

No loan made by an authority to an entity with which the authority has entered into a private enterprise agreement shall be deemed usurious or otherwise in violation of Code Section 7-4-17 so long as such loan complies with Code Section 7-4-18.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 8; Ga. L. 1939, p. 126, § 2; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 2; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 2; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 283, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1067, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1417, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 857, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1428, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 8; Ga. L. 2010, p. 404, § 1/SB 369.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, a period was substituted for a semicolon at the end of paragraph (a)(9).

8-3-31.
Eminent domain.

An authority shall have the right to acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any real property which it may deem necessary for its purposes under this article after the adoption by it of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the real property described therein is necessary for such purposes. An authority may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided in Title 22; or it may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by any other applicable statutory provisions for the exercise of the power of eminent domain. Property already devoted to a public use may be acquired, except that no real property belonging to the city, the county, the state, or any political subdivision thereof may be acquired without the consent of such city, county, state, or other political subdivision.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 12.

8-3-31.1.
“Public use” defined; eminent domain to be exercised solely for public use.

As used in this Code section, the term “public use” shall have the meaning specified in Code Section 22-1-1.

Any exercise of the power of eminent domain under this chapter or Chapter 4 of this title must:

Be for a public use; and

Be approved by resolution of the governing body of the municipality or county in conformity with the procedures specified in Code Section 22-1-10.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-31.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 2/HB 1313.

Cross references.

Eminent domain, generally, see §

21-1-1

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Code section shall apply to those condemnation proceedings filed on or after February 9, 2006, where title has not vested in the condemning authority unless constitutionally prohibited.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 enactment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

8-3-32.
Borrowing money and accepting grants and other financial assistance from federal government; taking over, leasing, or managing projects constructed or owned by federal government; purpose and intent of article.

An authority is empowered to borrow money or accept grants or other financial assistance from the federal government for, or in aid of, any housing project within its area of operation; to take over or lease or manage any housing project or undertaking constructed or owned by the federal government; and, to these ends, to comply with such conditions and enter into such mortgages, trust indentures, leases, or agreements as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable. It is the purpose and intent of this article to authorize every authority to do any and all things necessary or desirable to secure the financial aid or cooperation of the federal government in the undertaking, construction, maintenance, or operation of any housing project by such authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 20; Ga. L. 1939, p. 126, § 2; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 2; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 2; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 2.

8-3-33.
Contracts and agreements with federal government to obtain federal contributions to housing projects.

In any contract or amendatory or superseding contract for a loan and annual contributions heretofore or hereafter entered into between a housing authority and the federal government with respect to any housing project undertaken by said housing authority, the authority is authorized to make such covenants (including covenants with holders of bonds issued by the authority for purposes of the project involved) and to confer upon the federal government such rights and remedies as the authority deems necessary to assure the fulfillment of the purposes for which the project was undertaken.

In any contract with the federal government for annual contributions to an authority, the authority may obligate itself to convey to the federal government possession of or title to the project to which such contract relates, upon the occurrence of a substantial default, as defined in such contract, with respect to the covenants or conditions to which the authority is subject. Such obligation shall be specifically enforceable and shall not constitute a mortgage, any other laws notwithstanding.

Any contract with the federal government for annual contributions to an authority may further provide that in case of a conveyance pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, the federal government may complete, operate, manage, lease, convey, or otherwise deal with the project in accordance with the terms of such contract.

Any contract entered into pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section shall require that, as soon as practicable after the federal government is satisfied that all defaults with respect to the project have been cured and that the project will thereafter be operated in accordance with the terms of the contract, the federal government shall reconvey to the authority the project as then constituted.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 2; Ga. L. 1951, p. 219, § 3; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 2; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 2.

8-3-34.
Housing studies and analyses.

Any housing authority may, within its area of operation, undertake studies and analyses of housing needs and of the measures required to meet such needs, including the gathering of data with respect to population and family groups, and the distribution of such groups according to income, and the gathering of data with respect to the amount and quality of available housing, and its distribution according to rental and sales prices, employment, wages, and other factors affecting local housing needs and the measures required to meet such needs.

An authority may make the results of such studies and analyses available to the public and to the building, housing, and supply industries.

An authority may also engage in research and disseminate information on the subject of housing generally.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 270, § 2.

8-3-35.
Legislative findings; additional powers of authority; effect of financing with bond proceeds; issuance, sale, confirmation, and validation of bonds; venue of actions.

It is found and declared that from time to time there has existed and at the present time there exists an inadequate supply of funds at interest rates sufficiently low to enable the financing of safe and sanitary single and multifamily dwelling units for citizens of the state with low and moderate income; that the inability to finance such single and multifamily dwelling units results in an inability of builders to construct such housing, causing unemployment or underemployment in the housing construction and related businesses and causing a lack of safe and sanitary housing to be available to persons of low and moderate income; that such unemployment or underemployment in the housing construction and related businesses and an inadequate supply of safe and sanitary housing for persons of low and moderate income wastes human resources, increases the public assistance burden of the state, impairs the security of family life, impedes the economic and physical development of the state, adversely affects the welfare and prosperity of all of the people of the state, and accordingly creates and fosters conditions adverse to the general health and welfare of the citizens of the state; and that the making available in the manner provided in this Code section of a more adequate supply of funds at interest rates sufficiently low to enable the financing of safe and sanitary single and multifamily dwelling units for citizens of low and moderate income will result in the alleviation or reduction of the adverse consequences which have resulted and may result from continued unemployment and underemployment in the housing construction and related businesses and the inadequate supply of such housing for persons of low and moderate income.

In addition to the powers otherwise granted in this article, any authority shall have the following powers:

To purchase mortgage loans or other forms of collateral and participations therein from mortgage lenders and other holders of such collateral and to make commitments therefor;

To contract with mortgage lenders for the origination of, or the servicing of, mortgage loans to be made by such mortgage lenders to finance eligible housing units within the authority’s area of operation and the servicing of the mortgages securing such mortgage loans;

To make loans to mortgage lenders, provided that:

The proceeds of such loans shall be required to be used by such mortgage lenders for the making of mortgage loans to finance eligible housing units within the authority’s area of operation; and

If required by the authority, the mortgages in connection with the mortgage loans so made, together with any additional security required by the authority, shall be mortgaged, pledged, assigned, or otherwise provided as security for such loans to mortgage lenders;

To issue bonds from time to time, in its discretion, to provide funds to purchase mortgage loans or other forms of collateral or participation interests therein from mortgage lenders and to make loans to mortgage lenders and to make direct loans for eligible housing units as authorized in this Code section and to issue refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding or retiring bonds previously issued by it for any such purpose, in accordance with the provisions of this article, which may include, but are not limited to, bonds on which the principal and the interest are payable:

Exclusively from the income and revenues of the authority from one or more specified mortgage loans or other forms of collateral or participation interests therein from one or more specific loans to mortgage lenders, regardless of whether such mortgage loans or other forms of collateral or participation interests therein were purchased or such loans to mortgage lenders were made from the proceeds of such bonds; or

From revenues of the authority generally that are not otherwise pledged or obligated;

To exercise any and all rights accorded to the owner and holder of a mortgage under and in accordance with the terms of said instrument and the applicable laws of the state with respect to the mortgaged property, directly or through mortgage lenders or others acting on behalf of the authority or on behalf of the holders of its bonds, including, but without limitation, the power to foreclose, to forbear enforcement of any remedy on such terms as the authority shall deem appropriate, to sell the equity of redemption, to purchase the equity of redemption, and otherwise to sell and dispose of the mortgaged property, all as shall seem in the best interest of the authority and the holders of its bonds; and

To mortgage, pledge, assign, or grant security interests in any or all of its mortgage loans or other collateral or participation interests therein, its mortgages, and any interest of the authority created thereby in the underlying real and personal properties covered by such mortgages as security for the payment of the principal of, and interest on, any bonds issued by the authority, or as security for any agreements made in connection therewith, whether then owned or thereafter acquired, and to pledge the revenues from which bonds are payable as security for the payment of the principal of and interest on said bonds and any agreements made in connection therewith.

No eligible housing unit shall become subject to the provisions of Code Section 8-3-11 or Code Section 8-3-12 or entitled to the benefits of Code Section 8-3-8 solely by reason of having been financed, directly or indirectly, with proceeds of bonds issued by an authority for the purposes described in this Code section.

Any bonds issued by an authority as permitted under the terms of this article which are issued for the purposes described in this Code section shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of this article, except that such bonds may be sold at any price which shall be approved by the authority and may be sold at public or private sale without any public advertisement.

Bonds of an authority which are issued for the purposes described in this Code section shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with the procedures set forth in Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36 known as the “Revenue Bond Law,” and the judgment of validation shall have the same effect as is provided in said “Revenue Bond Law.”

Any action pertaining to issuance of bonds of an authority issued for the purposes described in this Code section, the rights of the holders thereof or the security therefor, and any action pertaining to the validation of any such bonds, shall be brought in the superior court of the county in which the eligible housing units to be financed with proceeds of such bonds are located, or if such eligible housing units shall be located in more than one county, in either the superior court of the county in which the authority is located or in the superior court of any county where any of such eligible housing units are situated.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 2228, § 2; Code 1981, §

8-3-35

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2228, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 8; Ga. L. 2008, p. 239, § 1/SB 397.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, quotation marks were added at the beginning and end of “Revenue Bond Law” at the end of subsection (e).

8-3-36.
Prohibition of nonresidents suspected of criminal acts.

Any housing authority created pursuant to this article, acting through its director or his or her designee, is authorized to prohibit, without breaching the peace, any person who is reasonably suspected of committing a criminal act on the premises of a housing project and who is not a resident of said project from entering, loitering, or remaining upon the common areas of such project.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-36

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 857, § 2.